District of Columbia statutes.
22-3903

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement this chapter.

(b)

The rules shall include provisions regarding notification to the victim of his or her right to request an HIV test, confidentiality of the test results, free counselling for the victim and the convicted individual concerning HIV testing and HIV disease, and referral for appropriate health care and supportive services.

Nov. 11, 1995, D.C. Law 11-74, § 4, 42 DCR 3624
1981 Ed., § 24-493.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see §§ 2 to 4 of the HIV Testing of Certain Criminal Offenders Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-87, July 6, 1995, 42 DCR 3617).